Hawaii statutes.
[§431:21-111] Duties and powers of the
commissioner. (a) The commissioner shall provide the association with a
statement of the net direct written premiums of each member insurer.

(b) The commissioner shall approve an
assessment of member insurers by the association when the association is
insolvent as defined in section [431:15-103(a)].

(c) The commissioner may suspend or revoke
after a hearing the certificate of authority of any member insurer which fails
to pay an assessment when due or fails to comply with the plan of operation.
As an alternative, the commissioner may levy a fine on any member insurer which
fails to pay an assessment when due. The fine shall not exceed five per cent
of the unpaid assessment per month and shall not be less than $100 per month.
[L 1991, c 284, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next